Idaho, session 2025, S1201.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the
Division of Medicaid the following amounts to be expended according to the
designated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,771,300 $1,771,300
Medicaid Management Information Systems Dedicated
Fund 11,720,000 11,720,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 107,926,700 107,926,700
TOTAL $121,418,000 $121,418,000
II. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $43,749,100 $43,749,100


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
Hospital Assessment
Fund 60,014,700 60,014,700
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 211,762,200 211,762,200
TOTAL $315,526,000 $315,526,000
III. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $11,996,900 $11,996,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 33,937,400 33,937,400
TOTAL $45,934,300 $45,934,300
IV. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,589,400 $5,589,400
Hospital Assessment
Fund 10,181,400 10,181,400
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 30,740,800 30,740,800
TOTAL $46,511,600 $46,511,600
V. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $9,546,100 $9,546,100
Hospital Assessment
Fund 7,047,600 7,047,600
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 142,069,900 142,069,900
TOTAL $158,663,600 $158,663,600


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
VI. EXTENDED EMPLOYMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $244,600 $91,600 $3,202,900 $3,539,100
GRAND TOTAL $244,600 $121,509,600 $569,838,400 $691,592,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Medicaid is hereby reduced by the following amounts for the Expansion
Medicaid Plan for trustee and benefit payments from the listed funds for the
period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General) Fund $6,050,000
Cooperative Welfare (Federal) Fund 11,350,000
TOTAL $17,400,000
SECTION 3. OUTPATIENT ADDICTION TREATMENT. The Department of Health
and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall explore a value-based payment model
for outpatient addiction treatment based on long-term recovery outcomes.
The division shall provide a report on its findings to the Joint Finance-Ap-
propriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the
Legislative Services Office no later than January 15, 2026.
SECTION 4. MEDICAID CONTRACT PERIODS AND MID-YEAR ADJUSTMENTS. The
Department of Health and Welfare's Division of Medicaid shall initiate the
process of transitioning multi-year contracts to coincide with the state's
fiscal year to enhance transparency. To the extent practicable, the divi-
sion shall eliminate mid-year contract adjustments that increase spending
without an appropriation from the Legislature. The division shall provide
a report on its progress to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and
the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office
no later than January 15, 2026.
SECTION 5. EMERGENCY MEDICAID REPORT. The Department of Health and Wel-
fare's Division of Medicaid shall submit an annual report on the number of
clients served and the total expenditures reimbursed through the Emergency
Medicaid program. The division shall provide the report to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office following the conclusion of each fiscal
year, but no later than September 15.


SECTION 6. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 7. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 8. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 323, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Divi-
sion of Medicaid the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MEDICAID ADMINISTRATION AND MEDICAL MGMT:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(General)
Fund $511,400 $511,400
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 1,534,100 1,534,100
TOTAL $2,045,500 $2,045,500
II. COORDINATED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment
Fund $60,014,700 $60,014,700


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
OPERATING BENEFIT
EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 89,952,100 89,952,100
TOTAL $149,966,800 $149,966,800
III. ENHANCED MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund $57,598,300 $57,598,300
IV. BASIC MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment
Fund $10,181,400 $10,181,400
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 116,563,300 116,563,300
TOTAL $126,744,700 $126,744,700
V. EXPANSION MEDICAID PLAN:
FROM:
Hospital Assessment
Fund $7,047,600 $7,047,600
CooperativeWelfare(Federal)
Fund 71,823,900 71,823,900
TOTAL $78,871,500 $78,871,500
GRAND TOTAL $2,045,500 $413,181,300 $415,226,800
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 8 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 7 of this act shall be
in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.